tools/hunspell-merge/output/el_gr_en_us.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY 'ABCDEFGHIKLMNOPRSTUVWYZabcdefghiklmnoprstuvwyzΆΈΉΊΌΎΏΐάέήίΰαβγδεζηθικλμνξοπρςστυφχψωϊϋόύώ
FLAG NUMBER

PFX 1 Y 1
PFX 1   0     α         .       # βάσιμος > αβάσιμος

PFX 2 Y 1
PFX 2   0     re         .

PFX 3 Y 1
PFX 3   0     ξανα      .       # ζητώ > ξαναζητώ

PFX 4 Y 1
PFX 4   0     απο       .       # σύνθεση > αποσύνθεση

PFX 5 Y 1
PFX 5   0     de          .

PFX 6 Y 1
PFX 6   0     κατα      .       # στροφή > καταστροφή

PFX 7 Y 1
PFX 7   0     παρα      .       # βλέπω > παραβλέπω

PFX 8 Y 1
PFX 8   0     dis         .

PFX 9 Y 1
PFX 9   0     con         .

PFX 10 Y 1
PFX 10   0     in         .

PFX 11 Y 1
PFX 11   0     pro         .

PFX 12 Y 1
PFX 12   0     un         .

REP 88
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ear are
REP ear air
REP ear ere
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP ch te
REP te ch
REP ch ti
REP ti ch
REP ch tu
REP tu ch
REP ch s
REP s ch
REP ch k
REP k ch
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP gh f
REP f gh
REP i igh
REP igh i
REP i uy
REP uy i
REP i ee
REP ee i
REP j di
REP di j
REP j gg
REP gg j
REP j ge
REP ge j
REP s ti
REP ti s
REP s ci
REP ci s
REP k cc
REP cc k
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP kw qu
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP o ew
REP ew o
REP oo ew
REP ew oo
REP ew ui
REP ui ew
REP oo ui
REP ui oo
REP ew u
REP u ew
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP u ieu
REP ieu u
REP ue ew
REP ew ue
REP uff ough
REP oo ieu
REP ieu oo
REP ier ear
REP ear ier
REP ear air
REP air ear
REP w qu
REP qu w
REP z ss
REP ss z
REP shun tion
REP shun sion
REP shun cion

SFX 13 Y 3
SFX 13   0     able       [^aeiou]
SFX 13   0     able       ee
SFX 13   e     able       [^aeiou]e

SFX 14 Y 4
SFX 14   0     d          e
SFX 14   y     ied        [^aeiou]y
SFX 14   0     ed         [^ey]
SFX 14   0     ed         [aeiou]y

SFX 15 Y 2
SFX 15   e     ing        e
SFX 15   0     ing        [^e]

SFX 16 N 2
SFX 16   y     ieth       y
SFX 16   0     th         [^y]

SFX 17 Y 2
SFX 17   e     ings       e
SFX 17   0     ings       [^e]

SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18   0     ment       .

SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19   0     's         .

SFX 20 Y 3
SFX 20   e     ion        e
SFX 20   y     ication    y
SFX 20   0     en         [^ey]

SFX 21 Y 3
SFX 21   y     iness      [^aeiou]y
SFX 21   0     ness       [aeiou]y
SFX 21   0     ness       [^y]

SFX 22 Y 4
SFX 22   0     r          e
SFX 22   y     ier        [^aeiou]y
SFX 22   0     er         [aeiou]y
SFX 22   0     er         [^ey]

SFX 23 Y 4
SFX 23   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX 23   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX 23   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX 23   0     s          [^sxzhy]

SFX 24 N 4
SFX 24   0     st         e
SFX 24   y     iest       [^aeiou]y
SFX 24   0     est        [aeiou]y
SFX 24   0     est        [^ey]

SFX 25 N 2
SFX 25   e     ive        e
SFX 25   0     ive        [^e]

SFX 26 Y 3
SFX 26   e     ions       e
SFX 26   y     ications   y
SFX 26   0     ens        [^ey]

SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27   0     ly         .

SFX 28 Y 4
SFX 28   0     rs         e
SFX 28   y     iers       [^aeiou]y
SFX 28   0     ers        [aeiou]y
SFX 28   0     ers        [^ey]

SFX 29 Y 5
SFX 29 ώ     άς         .    # αγαπώ > αγαπάς
SFX 29 ώ     ά          .    # αγαπώ > αγαπά
SFX 29 ώ     ούμε       .    # αγαπώ > αγαπάς
SFX 29 ώ     άτε        .    # αγαπώ > αγαπάς
SFX 29 ώ     ούν        .    # αγαπώ > αγαπάς
